Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.280

Board of adjustment—Rules and records.

The board of adjustment shall adopt rules for the transaction of its business and shall keep a public record of its transactions, findings and determinations.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.280. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 28.]